nl: Type zadelmontage: I-Beam; Geïntegreerd zadel/zadelpen; Pivotal; Zadel- en zadelpencombinatie; Standaard rails; Stealth pivotal; Overige
lt-LT: Balnelio tvirtinimo tipas: „I-Beam“; Integruota sėdynė / iškyša; „Pivotal“; Sėdynės ir iškyšos derinys; Standartiniai bėgeliai; „Stealth Pivotal“; Kita
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на седлото: I-Beam; Интегрирана седалка/колче; Pivotal; Комбинация от седалка и колче; Стандартни релси; Stealth Pivotal; Друго
cs: Typ uchycení sedla: I-Beam; Integrované sedlo / sedlovka; Pivotal; Kombinace sedla a sedlovky; Standardní ližiny; Stealth Pivotal; Jiné
ru: Тип крепления седла: I-Beam; Интегрированное седло/штырь; Pivotal; Седло и штырь; Стандартные рамки; Stealth Pivotal; Другое
zh-CN: 车座安装类型: I 型梁; 坐垫/座管一体; 枢轴式; 坐垫座管组合; 标准轨道; 隐形枢轴式; 其他
de: Anbringungsart des Sattels: I-Beam; Integrierter Sattel/Stütze; Pivotal; Sattel- und Stützen-Kombi; Standard-Streben; Stealth Pivotal; Sonstige
ja: サドルマウントタイプ: I ビーム; シート / ポスト一体型; ピボタル; シートポストコンボ; スタンダードレール; ステルスピボタル; その他
pl: Typ mocowania siodła: I-Beam; Zintegrowane ze sztycą; Pivotal; Zestaw siodełko i sztyca; Standardowe pręty; Stealth Pivotal; Inny
en: Saddle mounting type: I-Beam; Integrated seat/post; Pivotal; Seat and post combo; Standard rails; Stealth Pivotal; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže sjedala: I-Beam; Integrirano sjedalo / cijev; Pivotal; Kombinacija sjedala i cijevi; Standardne vodilice; Stealth Pivotal; Ostalo
ko: 안장 장착 유형: I-빔; 일체형 시트/포스트; 피보탈; 시트 및 포스트 콤보; 표준 레일; 스텔스 피보탈; 기타
ro-RO: Tip de montare a șeii: I-Beam; Șa/Tijă integrate; Pivotal; Combinație șa și tijă; Șine standard; Stealth Pivotal; Altele
sv: Typ av sadelmontering: I-Beam; Integrerad sadel/sadelstolpe; Pivotal; Sadel- och sadelstolpskombo; Standardrails; Stealth pivotal; Övrigt
es: Tipo de montaje de la montura: I-Beam; Asiento/tija integrados; Pivotal; Combo de asiento y tija; Rieles estándar; Stealth Pivotal; Otro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งอาน: ไอบีม; เบาะ/หลักอานในตัว; พิวอทัล; ชุดเบาะและหลักอาน; รางมาตรฐาน; สเตลธ์พิวอทัล; อื่นๆ
fr: Type à fixation par selle: I-Beam; Selle/tige intégrée; Pivotal; Ensemble selle et tige; Rails standards; Stealth Pivotal; Autre
da: Monteringstype for sadel: I-Beam; Integreret sadel/sadelpind; Pivotal; Kombineret sadel og sadelpind; Standard rails; Stealth pivotal; Andet
tr: Sele montaj tipi: I-Beam; Entegre sele/sele borusu; Pivotal; Sele ve sele borusu kombinasyonu; Standart raylar; Stealth Pivotal; Diğer
vi: Kiểu gắn yên xe: Chữ I; Yên và cọc yên tích hợp; Dạng chốt (Pivotal); Bộ yên và cọc yên; Ray tiêu chuẩn; Dạng chốt chìm (Stealth Pivotal); Khác
it: Tipo di montaggio della sella: I-Beam; Sella/reggisella integrato; Pivotal; Combo sella e reggisella; Binari standard; Stealth Pivotal; Altro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija drsnih letev: I-Beam; Vgrajen sedež/sedežna opora; Pivotal; Kombinacija sedeža in opore; Standardna vodila; Stealth Pivotal; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ pripevnenia sedla: I-Beam; Integrované sedadlo/sedlovka; Pivotal; Kombinácia sedla a sedlovky; Štandardné lyžiny; Stealth Pivotal; Iné
pt-BR: Selim, tipo de fixação: I-Beam; Assento/canote integrado; Pivotal; Combo de assento e canote; Trilhos padrão; Stealth Pivotal; Outros
hu: Nyereg rögzítési típusa: I-Beam; Integrált nyereg/cső; Pivotal; Nyereg és cső kombó; Szabványos pálca; Stealth Pivotal; Egyéb
nb: Monteringstype for sete: I-Beam; Integrert sete/setepinne; Pivotal; Kombinert sete og setepinne; Standard skinner; Stealth pivotal; Annet
el: Τύπος στερέωσης σέλας: I-Beam; Ενσωματωμένη σέλα/παλουκόσελο; Pivotal; Συνδυασμός σέλας και παλουκόσελου; Τυπικές ράγες; Stealth Pivotal; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da sela: I-beam; Selim/espigão integrado; Pivotal; Combinação de selim e espigão; Calhas padrão; Stealth pivotal; Outro
fi: Satulan kiinnitystyyppi: I-Beam; Integroitu satula ja satulatolppa; Pivotal; Satulan ja tolpan yhdistelmä; Vakiokiskot; Stealth Pivotal; Muu
zh-TW: 座墊安裝類型: 工字梁; 一體式坐墊 / 座管; 樞軸式; 坐墊與座管組合; 標準導軌; 隱藏樞軸式; 其他